Utah statutes.
16-4-312.   Affidavit and posting of notice -- Evidence.
(1)  An affidavit made by the secretary of a corporation of the mailing of a
notice required by this chapter is prima facie evidence of the existence and
mailing of the notice.
(2)  The publication of a notice under this chapter may be proved by the
affidavit of:
(a)  the printer foreman or principal clerk of the newspaper in which the
notice was published; and
(b)  in accordance with Section 45-1-101, the website publisher or website
publisher's designee charged with publishing the notice as required in Section
45-1-101.
(3)  The affidavit of the secretary of the corporation or the auctioneer
responsible for selling shares is prima facie evidence of:
(a)  the time and place of sale;
(b)  the quantity and particular description of the shares sold;
(c)  to whom and for what price the shares were sold; and
(d)  the fact of the purchase money being paid.
(4)  The affidavits referenced in this section shall be filed in the
corporation's office.
(5)  A copy of an affidavit referenced in this section is prima facie evidence
of the facts contained in the affidavit if the affidavit is certified by the
secretary.
